Utah statutes.
53A-24-304.   Division responsibilities.

 DSBVI may:

(1)  provide:

(a)  a business enterprise program;

(b)  sheltered workshops, employment, and training; and

(c)  vocational rehabilitation, training and adjustment, sight conservation, prevention of blindness, low vision lens, and recreational services for individuals who are blind or have visual impairments;

(2)  assist public education officials in the discharge of their duties towards children who are blind or have visual impairments, and perform services related to vision screening under Section 53A-11-203;

(3)  maintain a register of individuals who are blind or have visual impairments, including such facts as the board considers necessary for proper planning, administration, and operations, but protecting against unwarranted invasions of privacy;

(4)  establish and operate community service centers, rehabilitation facilities, and workshops; and

(5)  perform other duties assigned by the executive director or the board.



Amended by Chapter 37, 1996 General Session

